Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 21 Uniform Commercial Code

Editor's notes. —

The management council, at its December 8, 1989 meeting, renumbered former articles 1 through 10 (§§

34-21-101

through 34-21-1002) of this chapter, in accordance with §

28-8-105

, as present title 34.1 (§§ 34.1-1-101 through 34.1-10-104). For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.